Tennessee, session 114, SB0803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(b)(3), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision (C):
(C) An institution accredited by the National Accrediting Commission of Career
Arts and Sciences (NACCAS) that has its primary campus domiciled in this state;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(b)(1), is amended by
adding the language "or an eligible postsecondary institution, as defined in subdivision
(b)(3)(C)," after "Tennessee college of applied technology".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(b)(4), is amended by
designating subdivision (B) as subdivision (C) and adding the following as subdivision (B):
(B) Includes, beginning with the fall semester of the 2025-2026 academic year, a
curriculum of courses leading to a certificate, diploma, or other credential at an eligible
postsecondary institution, as defined in subdivision (b)(3)(C);
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(b)(5), is amended by
adding the language "or eligible postsecondary institution, as defined in subdivision (b)(3)(C)"
after "Tennessee college of applied technology".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(c)(3), is amended by
adding the language "or eligible postsecondary institution, as defined in subdivision (b)(3)(C)"
after "Tennessee college of applied technology".
SB0803
001344
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(c), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (5) and (6) and substituting instead the following:
(5) A Tennessee Promise scholarship:
(A) At a Tennessee public two-year postsecondary institution or
Tennessee college of applied technology is the cost of tuition and mandatory
fees at the eligible postsecondary institution attended less all other gift aid. Gift
aid must be credited first to the student's tuition and mandatory fees; or
(B) At an eligible four-year public postsecondary institution or an eligible
private institution, which includes an eligible postsecondary institution, as defined
in subdivision (b)(3)(C), is the average cost of tuition and mandatory fees at the
public two-year postsecondary institutions less all other gift aid. Gift aid must be
credited first to the student's tuition and mandatory fees;
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(12) Notwithstanding this subsection (c) to the contrary, to be eligible for the
scholarship at an eligible postsecondary institution, as defined in subdivision (b)(3)(C),
TSAC must first determine that there are no available enrollment slots at a Tennessee
college of applied technology in the county in which the student resides for the student's
desired program of study. If there are available enrollment slots at a Tennessee college
of applied technology in the county in which the student resides for the student's desired
program of study, then the student must be enrolled in a Tennessee college of applied
technology in order to receive the scholarship.
SECTION 8. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to Tennessee Promise scholarships awarded for the 2025-2026 academic year and
each academic year thereafter.
- 2 - 001344